California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 department may also use moneys in this account, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, for the purpose of supporting practice transformation activities in dental provider offices that treat Medi-Cal patients. Practice transformation activities include, but are not limited to, value-based payments, use or enhanced use of electronic medical records, care coordination with primary and specialty care providers, and training and retention of dental staff and clinicians.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.120.7.

Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account

(a) The Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account is hereby created within the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund. Moneys in the Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account shall be used as set forth in this section.

(b) Fifty percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited in the Advanced Practice Clinicians and Allied Health Care Loan Repayment Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account. Moneys in this subaccount shall be used for the purpose of establishing an educational loan repayment program for advanced practice clinicians and allied health care professionals. The department shall,
 subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, determine the eligibility and qualifications for loan repayment.

(c) Fifty percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited into the CalHealthCares Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account. Moneys in this subaccount shall be used for the purpose of providing increased funding for educational loan repayment for physicians and dentists through the CalHealthCares Program.

(d) (1) On and after January 1, 2030, the maximum allowable balance of unencumbered moneys in this account shall be one hundred twenty-eight million dollars ($128,000,000). As long as this account is at or above one hundred twenty-eight million dollars ($128,000,000), moneys otherwise required to be deposited in this account shall instead be deposited on a pro rata basis
 into the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) which are not at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(2) This subdivision does not apply if this account is at or above one hundred twenty-eight million dollars ($128,000,000) as a result of the department violating its nondiscretionary ministerial duty set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14199.106, or if the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) are all simultaneously at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.120.9.

Medi-Cal Access and Support Account

(a) Moneys in the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account shall be used as set forth in this section.

(b) Moneys in this account shall be used by the department to provide overall support to the Medi-Cal program and maintain access to necessary health care services.

(c) Section 14199.107 does not apply to moneys in this account.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Input, Approvals, and Adjustments  [14199.121. - 14199.122.]

14199.121.

Stakeholder Input

(a) (1) The department, or any other state government agency or entity that implements any part of this chapter, shall consult with, and obtain written input from, the stakeholder advisory committee regarding the development and implementation of the components of this chapter.

(2) Examples of matters for which the department shall consult with, and obtain written input from, the committee shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) A proposal for, or the development of, a payment rate, supplemental payment, directed payment, or other payment methodology or methodologies.

(B) The establishment of the criteria or eligibility for increased payments or grants.

(C) The issuance of provider bulletins, all-plan letters, or other similar instructions or departmental guidance.

(b) Before proposing a new payment methodology or a change to an existing payment methodology pursuant to this chapter, the department shall consult with, and obtain written input from, the stakeholder advisory committee.

(c) An express reference elsewhere in this chapter to obtaining stakeholder committee input does not imply that stakeholder committee input is not required for other parts of this chapter where an express reference does not exist.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.122.

Implementation; Federal Financial Participation; Modifications and Adjustments Necessary for Federal Approval

(a) The department shall seek any federal approvals that are necessary to implement this chapter.

(b) The department shall, wherever possible and to the extent feasible, seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal financial participation in implementing this chapter.

(c) (1) The department may modify or make adjustments to the payment provisions set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) to the extent necessary to accomplish any of the following:

(A) Meet the requirements of federal statutes or regulations.

(B) Obtain or maintain federal approval.

(C) Ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) Any payment provision modification or adjustment described in paragraph (1) shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(A) The modification or adjustment does not otherwise conflict with the purposes of this chapter.

(B) The modification or adjustment is consistent with the purpose of increasing payments and access to services pursuant to this chapter.

(C) The
 department shall comply with the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121.

(d) (1) Payments made pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) shall be effective for dates of service on and after January 1, 2027. To the extent consistent with the purposes of this chapter, and unless otherwise specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109), the department may, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, extend one or more payment methodologies used for the targeted payment increases for the 2026 calendar year pursuant to Section 14105.202 for purposes of implementing the increased payments pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) in the 2027 calendar year and subsequent calendar years as applicable.

(2) Unless otherwise specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109),
 payments made pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) may be implemented using one or more of the following:

(A) Medi-Cal provider rate increases, including increases in rates paid in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, or establishing or raising the level of minimum fee schedules in Medi-Cal managed care, or both.

(B) New or expanded supplemental payments for Medi-Cal providers.

(C) New or expanded directed payments for Medi-Cal providers.

(D) Other forms of increased reimbursement for Medi-Cal providers, consistent with the provisions and intent of this chapter.

(e) The department may require Medi-Cal managed care plans and providers of the applicable services
 to submit information the department deems necessary to implement and monitor compliance with this chapter, at the times and in the form and manner specified by the department.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code but subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, the department may implement this chapter by means of provider bulletins, all-plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action. The department shall provide notification to the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and to the Legislature’s relevant fiscal and policy committees at least five working days before taking action.

(2) If the department enters into an interagency agreement with another state government agency or entity
 to administer and implement a portion of this chapter, that other agency or department shall be covered by paragraph (1).

(g) For purposes of implementing this chapter, the department or its designated state government agency or entity may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Continuation of Managed Care Organization Provider Tax  [14199.123. - 14199.127.]

14199.123.

Continued Imposition of Tax

(a) It is the intent of the people of the State of California to permanently continue in existence a managed care organization provider tax upon the expiration of the tax imposed by Section 14199.84.

(b) Therefore, upon the expiration of the tax imposed pursuant to Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7, a managed care organization provider tax shall hereby continue to be imposed on and after January 1, 2027, as provided in this article.

(c) The department shall implement and administer the tax as set forth in this article.

(d) To the extent permitted by federal law, the models and methodologies developed for Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 2023 shall be substantially utilized by the department in implementing the tax imposed by this article.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.124.

Implementation of Tax

(a) In implementing the tax imposed by subdivision (b) of Section 14199.123, the department shall adhere to all of the following:

(1) The tax shall not exceed the limits set forth in Section 14199.126.

(2) The models and methodologies utilized by the department shall be substantially similar to those relied upon for imposition of the tax set forth in Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7.

(3) The tax shall comply with federal Medicaid requirements applicable to permissible health care-related taxes, including, but not limited
 to, Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) Consistent with the limits set forth in Section 14199.126, the department shall attempt to maximize the amount of federal matching funds.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), if the requirements set forth in Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or any other provision of federal law with which the tax imposed by this article must comply, are replaced by amended or successor requirements, the department shall ensure the tax imposed pursuant to this article complies with those amended or successor requirements.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the limits set forth in Section 14199.126 shall not be exceeded.

(c) (1) Commencing on the effective date of this chapter, the department shall be required to seek federal renewal and reauthorization as necessary to continue the imposition of the tax imposed by this article.

(2) The department shall request approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as is necessary to implement this article. The department shall not impose or collect the tax imposed pursuant to this article until the department receives approval from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the tax is a permissible health care-related tax in accordance with Section 433.68 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and is eligible for federal financial participation.

(d) (1) Consistent with the limits set forth in Section 14199.126, the department may, upon consultation with affected taxpayers,
 modify or make minor adjustments to any methodology, tax amount, taxing tier, or other provision specified in this article to the extent it is reasonably necessary to meet the requirements of federal statute or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) When making, or considering making, any adjustment described in paragraph (1), the department shall share with affected taxpayers and the stakeholder advisory committee relevant information, proposals, drafts, and any information affecting tax liability at least 90 calendar days in advance of seeking federal approval for the adjustment. The department shall provide notice of any final adjustment in tax liability to affected taxpayers at least 45 calendar days before the adjustment takes effect.

(e) In implementing this article,
 the department may establish a specific calendar year as the base year and use the base data source to determine for each health plan each of the enrollment totals described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.83, as that section read in Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 2023.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.125.

Tax Computation and Collection

(a) Before each applicable calendar year or years, the department shall compute the annual tax liability for each taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by Section 14199.123.

(b) For each tax period, the department shall establish all of the following:

(1) The Medi-Cal taxing tiers based on countable Medi-Cal enrollees in a health plan.

(2) The Medi-Cal per enrollee tax amount for each Medi-Cal taxing tier.

(3) Subject to the limits in Section 14199.126, the other taxing tiers
 based on countable other enrollees in a health plan.

(4) Subject to the limits in Section 14199.126, the other per enrollee tax amount for each other taxing tier.

(c) The procedures for collection and payment of the tax, providing notices, interest charges not to exceed 10 percent per annum for late payments, penalties, refunds, and tax liability after a transfer of health plan responsibility shall be established by the department consistent with the applicable provisions of Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7 unless otherwise specified in this chapter.

(d) (1) The director may correct any identified material or significant error in the data, including, but not limited to, the overall cumulative enrollment, Medicare cumulative enrollment, Medi-Cal cumulative enrollment,
 plan-to-plan cumulative enrollment, cumulative enrollment through the Federal Employees Health Benefits Act of 1959 (Public Law 86-382), and other cumulative enrollment. The director’s determination as to whether to exercise discretion under this subdivision and any determination made by the director under this subdivision shall not be subject to judicial review, except that a health plan may bring a writ of mandate under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure to rectify an abuse of discretion by the department in correcting that health plan’s data when that correction results in a greater tax amount for that health plan.

(2) The authority granted to the director by this subdivision does not permit the limits set forth in Section 14199.126 to be exceeded.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.126.

Limits on Tax Amounts

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law, and except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the tax imposed by this article shall comply with both of the following:

(1) The other per enrollee tax amount for any other taxing tier shall not exceed two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per month.

(2) The total aggregate tax amount imposed on, or through, all other taxing tiers shall not exceed thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000) in a single calendar year.

(b) The dollar amounts set forth in paragraph (1) and
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be increased by the department quinquennially to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) beginning on January 1, 2030. At the request of the department, the Controller’s office shall calculate and publish the adjustments permitted by this subdivision.

(c) When seeking federal renewal and reauthorization for calendar years commencing on or after January 1, 2027, the department may exceed either of the following by not more than 10 percent if doing so is necessary to comply with federal statute or regulations, ensure federal financial participation, or otherwise obtain federal approval:

(1) The limits set forth in subdivision (a), as modified pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The limits set forth in subdivision (a), as
 modified pursuant to subdivision (b), and including the amount of any prior adjustments made pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) Except as provided by subdivisions (b) and (c), all other changes to the limits set forth in subdivision (a) shall only be made pursuant to Section 14199.134.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.127.

Operation

(a) This article shall be inoperative during any portion of a calendar year for which the department does not obtain the necessary federal approvals for the tax imposed pursuant to Section 14199.123.

(b) This article shall cease to be operative for any affected tax period or periods upon a final determination of a court of competent jurisdiction, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the tax imposed pursuant to this article cannot be implemented for the affected tax period or periods.

(c) Upon a failure to obtain federal approval as
 described in subdivision (a), or a final determination as described in subdivision (b), the director shall implement a plan for conducting all appropriate wind-down and closeout activities, including issuance of any refunds, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the stakeholder advisory committee.

(d) This chapter does not change, alter, or abrogate the department’s legal and fiscal responsibility under state and federal law to monitor provider participation and beneficiary access to entitled services under California’s Medicaid State Plan or federally approved waivers. The department continues to have full legal and fiscal responsibility to adjust rates, payment methodologies, and authorization processes for programs, providers, or benefits within this chapter, as well as those not specifically mentioned herein.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Definitions [14199.128. - 14199.128.]

14199.128.

Definitions

For purposes of this chapter, as used in both the singular and plural form, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Abortion” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 123464 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Acute psychiatric hospital” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Advanced practice clinicians and allied health care professionals” shall be defined by the department, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, to include appropriate health profession careers.

(d) “Article 7.1” means Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7, as added by Chapter 13 of the Statutes of 2023.

(e) “Base data source” means the most recent available quarterly financial statement filings or annual enrollment data submitted by health plans to the Department of Managed Health Care for that updated base year, retrieved by the department, and supplemented by, as necessary, Medi-Cal enrollment data for the updated base year as maintained by the department, and as modified by the department to account for known or anticipated contracting changes that will affect Medi-Cal enrollment.

(f) “Base year” means a 12-month period running from January 1 through December 31 of a calendar year selected by the department. The department may elect to update the base year to the extent it deems
 necessary to meet the requirements of federal statute or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) “Bona fide labor-management cooperation committee” or “bona fide LMCC” means a joint labor-management committee that is established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) and meets the following criteria:

(1) The bona fide LMCC is not involved in the governance of a health care entity but exists to promote worker training, workforce expansion, and support for workers during training.

(2) The bona fide LMCC has the following composition:

(A) Fifty percent of the committee consists of representatives of
 organized labor unions that represent health workers in the state.

(B) Fifty percent of the committee consists of representatives of health care employers that primarily serve Medi-Cal patients located in the state.

(h) “CalHealthCares Program” means the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program Act established pursuant to Section 14114.

(i) “California Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act of 2020” means the program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 127690) of Part 2 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) “Clinic” means any of the following:

(1) Federally qualified health centers (FQHC), including FQHC look-alike clinics designated by the
 federal Health Resources and Services Administration as meeting FQHC program requirements as set forth in Sections 1395x(aa)(4)(B) and 1396d(1)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Rural health clinics (RHC) meeting the definition set forth in Section 1396d(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) Clinics licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Tribal clinics exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Intermittent clinics exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Clinics exempt from licensure pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code. If clinics exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code choose to participate in a directed payment program described in Section 14199.120.5, the directed payment program will use the “classes of provider” functionality at a minimum to create a tier for those clinics and allow for payments to those clinics to be based on an amount allocated to their class’s pool.

(7) Indian health clinics that provide services in California pursuant to the Indian Health Program, as set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 124575) of Part 4 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) “Committee” or “stakeholder advisory committee” means the Protect Access to Health Care Act Stakeholder Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 14199.129.

(l) “Community-based organization” means a nonprofit organization of demonstrated effectiveness that is representative of a community or significant segments of a community and promotes access to, or provides physical or mental health or related services to, individuals in the community.

(m) “Community health worker” shall have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14132.36.

(n) “Community provider” means a holder of a certificate described in Section 2050 of the Business and
 Professions Code who serves Medi-Cal patients.

(o) “Comprehensive clinical family planning services” means the services set forth in subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(p) “Countable enrollee” means an individual enrolled in a health plan during a month of the base year according to the base data source. “Countable enrollee” does not include an individual enrolled in a Medicare plan, a plan-to-plan enrollee, or an individual enrolled in a health plan pursuant to the Federal Employees Health Benefits Act of 1959 (Public Law 86-382) to the extent the imposition of the tax under Article 6 (commencing with Section 14199.123) of this chapter or Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7 is preempted pursuant to Section 8909(f) of Title 5 of the United States Code.

(q) “County mental health plan” means an
 entity or local agency that contracts with the department to provide covered specialty mental health services pursuant to Section 14184.400 and Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(r) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(s) “Designated public hospital system” means a designated public hospital as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 14184.10 and its affiliated governmental providers and contracted governmental and nongovernmental entities that constitute a hospital and health care system. A single designated public hospital system may include multiple designated public hospitals under common government ownership.

(t) (1) “Directed payment” means a payment arrangement whereby the department directs certain expenditures made by a Medi-Cal
 managed care plan that is approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as described in Section 438(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to Section 438(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or otherwise required by the Medi-Cal managed care plan contract, and documented in a rate certification approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as applicable.

(2) References in this subdivision to Section 438(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall include any subsequent amendments thereto.

(u) “Director” means the director of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(v) “Emergency air ambulance transport” means emergency medical transportation by air, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section
 51323 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, by air ambulance, as defined in Section 100280 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(w) “Family PACT” means the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment Program established pursuant to subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(x) “Family planning services and family planning-related services in the Medi-Cal program” means the services covered by the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 14132.

(y) “Family planning services in the State-Only Family Planning Program” means the services covered by that program pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 24000).

(z) “Fund” means the Protect Access to Health Care Fund established in the State Treasury pursuant to
 Section 14199.103.

(aa) “General acute care hospital” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ab) “Ground emergency medical transports” means emergency medical transports, as defined in Section 14129, that originate from a 911 call center or equivalent public safety answering point.

(ac) “Health care service plan” or “health plan” means a health care service plan, other than a plan that provides only specialized or discount services, that is licensed by the Department of Managed Health Care under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) or a Medi-Cal managed care plan contracted with the department to provide full-scope Medi-Cal services.

(ad) “Medi-Cal patient” means a Medi-Cal beneficiary as defined in Section 14252.

(ae) “Medi-Cal enrollee” means an individual enrolled in a health plan, as defined in subdivision (ac), who is a Medi-Cal patient for whom the department directly pays the health plan a capitated payment.

(af) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal patients pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(ag) “Medi-Cal per enrollee tax amount” means the amount of tax assessed per countable Medi-Cal enrollee within a Medi-Cal taxing tier.

(ah) “Medi-Cal taxing tier” means a range of cumulative enrollment of countable Medi-Cal enrollees for the base year.

(ai) “Net reimbursement” or “net reimbursement levels” means the total payments to Medi-Cal providers for the applicable services and procedures received as of January 1, 2024, less any amounts financed by Medi-Cal providers as the nonfederal share of those payments via provider taxes or fees, certified public expenditures, or intergovernmental transfers.

(aj) “Network provider” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ak) “Other enrollee” means an individual enrolled in a health plan who is not a Medi-Cal enrollee.

(al) “Other per enrollee tax amount” means the amount of tax assessed per countable other enrollee within an other taxing tier.

(am) “Other taxing tier” means a range of cumulative enrollment of countable other enrollees for the base year.

(an) “Plan-to-plan enrollee” means an individual who receives their health care services through a health plan pursuant to a subcontract from another health plan.

(ao) “Primary care” has the same meaning as in Section 51170.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ap) “Private ground emergency medical transport provider” means a provider of ground emergency medical transports that does not meet the definition of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.945.

(aq) “Qualified family planning provider” means a Medi-Cal provider that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is a community clinic licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Is enrolled in the Family PACT program, as described in subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(3) Provides both abortion and contraception services.

(ar) “Specialist” means a physician or surgeon or other licensee pursuant to the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code) or the Osteopathic Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code) who delivers to
 Medi-Cal patients health care services, treatment, or procedures at least some of which do not qualify as primary care.

(as) “Specialty care” means health care services provided by a specialist.

(at) “State-Only Family Planning Program” means the program established pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 24000).

(au) “Tax period” means a period of not more than 12 months for which the tax imposed pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 14199.123) is assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 114.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Stakeholder Advisory Committee [14199.129. - 14199.133.]

14199.129.

Stakeholder Advisory Committee Established

(a) The Protect Access to Health Care Act Stakeholder Advisory Committee is hereby established within the department.

(b) An individual holding federal, state, tribal, or local elected or appointed office or an officer or official of a political party is not eligible for appointment to the committee.

(c) Six members of the committee constitute a quorum for purposes of voting and conducting business of the committee.

(d) The committee shall elect a chairperson from among its membership. The chairperson shall serve in that
 capacity for two years and is eligible for reelection. The chairperson shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of other committee members.

(e) The committee shall meet not less than biennially, and may hold additional regular and special meetings at the call of the committee or the chairperson.

(f) At least two employees of the department shall be assigned full-time to staffing and supporting the committee.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.130.

Committee Membership

(a) The committee shall be composed of 10 members as follows:

(1) One member that represents both primary and specialty physicians on a statewide basis.

(2) One member that represents both public and private hospitals, regardless of licensure type, on a statewide basis.

(3) One member that represents a private emergency ambulance provider that performs 500,000 or more emergency medical ground transports per calendar year in this state.

(4) One member that represents family planning
 and reproductive health providers on a statewide basis.

(5) One member that represents commercial, nongovernmental Medi-Cal managed care plans on a statewide basis.

(6) One member that represents clinics on a statewide basis.

(7) One member that represents public, nonprofit Medi-Cal managed care plans on a statewide basis.

(8) One member that represents dentists on a statewide basis.

(9) One member that represents organized labor groups on a statewide basis.

(10) One member that represents a private emergency air ambulance transport provider that bills for more than 2,000 emergency ambulance transports per year in this
 state.

(b) Committee members shall be appointed as follows:

(1) The Governor shall appoint the members described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(2) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint the members described in paragraphs (7) and (8) of subdivision (a).

(3) The Senate President Pro Tempore shall appoint the members described in paragraphs (9) and (10) of subdivision (a).

(c) An entity or organization shall not have more than one employee, officer, or director from that entity or organization appointed to the committee at any given time.

(d) Each member of the committee shall either be a citizen
 and resident of the United States or satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1020 of the Government Code.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.131.

Committee Member Terms

(a) Each appointing authority described in subdivision (b) of Section 14199.130 shall make their initial appointments not later than 30 calendar days after the effective date of this chapter.

(b) The term of initial appointees to the committee shall begin on the 45th calendar day after the effective date of this chapter. The terms of initial appointees to the committee shall be as follows:

(1) The Governor’s initial appointees described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.130 shall serve for a term of four years.

(2) The Governor’s initial appointees described in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.130 shall serve for a term of three years.

(3) The Assembly Speaker’s initial appointee described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.130 shall serve for a term of three years.

(4) The Assembly Speaker’s initial appointee described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.130 shall serve for a term of two years.

(5) The Senate President Pro Tempore’s initial appointees shall serve for a term of two years.

(c) After the initial terms, the term of each appointed or reappointed committee member shall be four years. Each member of the committee shall serve until a successor is appointed.

(d) A member of the committee shall not be removed by the appointing authority except for malfeasance in office or neglect of duty. A member shall not be removed unless the reasons for removal are presented in writing to the member.

(e) (1) A member of the committee appointed to represent a specific category described in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14199.130 shall notify in writing their appointing authority if they no longer represent that specific category or are otherwise unable to continue serving as a member of the committee. The notice required by this paragraph shall be provided within 15 calendar days of the changed circumstance.

(2) Upon receipt of the written notice by the appointing authority, the member’s position on the committee shall be deemed
 vacant. Within 30 calendar days of receipt of the written notice, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor to serve the remainder of the former member’s term. Upon expiration of the unexpired term, the successor may be appointed to a full term.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.132.
